Louisiana, session 2026, HB916.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 13:754(F)(3) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§754. Louisiana Clerks' Remote Access Authority; membership; board of
commission; statewide portal
* * *
F.
* * *
(3) An additional fee of five dollars shall apply to each recording subject to
the provisions of Paragraph (1) of this Subsection. The member shall retain fifty
cents of the fee provided for in this Paragraph. The remainder of the fee shall then
be remitted to LCRAA by the tenth of the month. The LCRAA shall retain fifty cents
of the fee and remit the remainder to the Court Modernization and Technology Fund,
created pursuant to R.S. 39:100.211, to be dedicated for those purposes including
cooperation with LCRAA concerning statewide court electronic filing integration.
The Louisiana Supreme Court and appellate courts shall enter into cooperative
agreements concerning the delivery of a single filing platform for the appellate
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 916 ENROLLED
courts with the goal of full integration between all appellate courts and the statewide
LCRAA filing platform.
* * *
Section 2. The additional fee for recordings required by R.S. 13:754(F)(3) as enacted
by Section 1 of this Act shall apply on January 1, 2027, and thereafter.
Section 3. The LCRAA shall provide a report to the legislature no later than the start
of the 2028 Regular Session of the Legislature of Louisiana detailing the total dollars
collected pursuant to R.S. 13:754(F)(3) and the progress made on the delivery of an
integrated single filing platform between all appellate courts and the statewide LCRAA
filing platform.
Section 4. The provisions of R.S. 13:754(F)(3) shall expire on August 1, 2029,
unless extended by legislative Act.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.